Idaho, session 2025, H0454.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Pro-
gram's Division of Teachers an additional $1,630,500 from the Public School
Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $1,630,500 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public School Support Program's Division of Teachers, $1,630,500
shall be considered expended from the General Fund for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.